Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles (DMV) to develop a plan to extend DMV licensing and registration renewal deadlines and other statutory and regulatory DMV requirements to mitigate contagion risk
by reducing customer traffic throughout all DMV district offices; and

WHEREAS, consistent with Centers for Disease Control (CDC) guidelines regarding social distancing, and in consultation with the Commissioner of the VDH, the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in order to protect individuals
at risk for severe illness, including, among numerous other measures, suspension of all in-person transactions at the DMV; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, incremental and evidence-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy and continues to do so with the limited reopening of in-person operations at the DMV.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby modify Directive 3 to the
DMV issued March 18, 2020 to authorize the Commissioner of DMV to resume limited in-person DMV transactions, including the resumption of driver’s license examinations, but only in accordance with appropriate occupancy
limits and physical distancing, health and sanitation and training measures, subject to the approval of the Governor.

1.

Continuity of DMV Services Plan.
In order to meet the needs of DMV customers, the Commissioner of the DMV shall modify the COVID-19 related Continuity of DMV Services Plan to allow for the implementation of an incremental phased and
evidence-based approach to resumption of DMV operations. The Commissioner DMV shall develop such policies and procedures necessary to facilitate the continued processing of registrations, renewals, transfer registrations
and other services to the extent possible by mail, phone and on-line and undertake the measures needed to safely resume in-person services as needed to safely, effectively and efficiently address the concerns of DMV
customers.

2.

Commissioner Authority.
The Commissioner of DMV shall oversee the implementation of this Directive, as amended.

This Directive, as amended, shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until June 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Department of Public Safety/Division of
Emergency Management and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Directive, as amended.

Dated June 1, 2020

GUBERNATORIAL DIRECTIVE TO THE BOARD AND COMMISSIONER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LIQUOR AND LOTTERY

DIRECTIVE 4 —REGULATORY AMENDMENTS
Amended March 20, 2020

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued an Executive Order declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, many additional cases of COVID-19 have been tested as presumptively positive in the State; and

WHEREAS, on Monday, March 16, the Governor imposed additional social distancing measures in order to mitigate the spread of COVID-19 including the prohibition of on-premises consumption of food or drink at any restaurant, bar, or establishment that offers
food or drink, effective Tuesday, March 17, 2020 at 2:00 p.m. and continuing in full force and effect until April 6, 2020; and

WHEREAS, restaurants, bars and establishments that offer food or drink may continue to offer food for take-out and by delivery; and

WHEREAS, alcohol sales can make up over 40% of the revenue of restaurants and establishments that offer food or drink; and

WHEREAS, it is critical the State avoid adverse economic impacts where possible; and

WHEREAS, in light of the significant economic impacts being imposed on restaurants and establishments that offer food or drink and their employees, as well as the social distancing measures being asked of Vermonters, the Governor has determined to permit
“to-go” sales and delivery of beverage alcohol with the purchase of a meal, as well as the delivery of alcohol product by licensed retail stores.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, specifically

20 V.S.A. § 8(b)(1)
, hereby order that the rules of the Board of the Department of Liquor and Lottery (“Board”) are hereby amended or rescinded, as necessary, to permit “to-go” sales and delivery of beverage alcohol
with the purchase of a meal, as well as the delivery of alcohol product by licensed retail stores, as follows:

1.
1st class licensees are hereby authorized to allow for take-out, curbside pickup and delivery of beverage alcohol, including spirit-based drinks and malt and vinous product accompanying food orders for
off premise consumption.

2.
2nd and 4th class licensees shall be authorized to allow for delivery and curbside pickup of un-opened containers of spirits, spirit-based product and malt and vinous product.

3.
Other licensees who serve food, or who partner with entities who serve food, are authorized to allow for take-out, curbside pickup and delivery of beverage alcohol, including spirit-based drinks and malt
and vinous product accompanying food orders for off premise consumption.

4.
The permissible hours for delivery shall be from 10:00 a.m. until 11:00 p.m.

5.
For deliveries, the licensee shall be able to travel from town to town or from place to place carrying orders for delivery of any alcohol product they are licensed to sell and authorized to deliver hereunder
without a delivery permit, provided the following conditions are met:

a.
The person making the delivery is at least 18 years old and is certified to sell or serve alcohol by the Board.

b.
All deliveries shall be in person to a physical building or residence.

c.
Licensees shall maintain an inspectable log of all deliveries made and such log shall at a minimum include:

i.
Name of recipient and physical address in Vermont to where the product was delivered;

ii.
How ID was verified;

iii.
A signature of recipient at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

iv.
Complete description of the product and quantity delivered;

v.
Time of delivery;

vi.
The name of the employee making the delivery.

6.
Any additional guidance or recommendations by the Commissioner or the Board in this regard shall be subject to the Governor’s review and approval. Any order of the Board relating to this matter following
the declaration of the State of Emergency, which has not received the approval of the Governor, is hereby rescinded.

7.
The Board shall not penalize any 1st class or 2nd class licensee who is in compliance with the terms of this Directive and any approved guidance issued hereunder.

This Directive shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with VDH and DPS/VEM, shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this
Directive.

Dated March 19, 2020

GUBERNATORIAL DIRECTIVE TO ALL SCHOOL BOARDS AND SUPERINTENDENTS AND CHILD CARE PROVIDERS

DIRECTIVE 5 — CONTINUITY OF LEARNING PLANNING

PROVISION OF SERVICES TO CHILDREN OF ESSENTIAL PERSONS DURING CLOSURE PERIOD IN RESPONSE TO COVID-19

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued an Executive Order (“Executive Order”), declaring a State of Emergency for the State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, the number of additional cases of COVID-19 has grown exponentially and sadly, but not surprisingly Vermont is experiencing its fatal impact; and

WHEREAS, on March 15, 2020, the Governor issued a Directive to all School Boards and Superintendents (“School Continuity Directive”), dismissing schools from March 18, 2020 through April 6, 2020 (“Closure Period”) and directing Continuity of Education
Planning; and

WHEREAS, the School Continuity Directive delegated authority to the Secretary of the Agency of Education (“Education Secretary”) to oversee its implementation, including with respect to addressing the child care needs of healthcare workers and other Vermonters
essential to the COVID-19 response (“Essential Persons”), during the Closure Period; and

WHEREAS, on March 17, 2020, the Governor issued a Directive to all School Boards, Superintendents and Child Care Providers (“Child Care Directive”), to close all routine child care operations and provide for the care of the infants, pre-k children and
children through grade 8 of Essential Persons, during the Closure Period; and

WHEREAS, on March 24, 2020, the Governor issued Addendum 6 to the Executive Order (“Stay Home/Stay Safe”), which puts additional restrictive measures in place to minimize all unnecessary activities outside the home to slow the spread of COVID-19 and protect
the public; and

WHEREAS, Stay Home/Stay Safe was implemented in consultation with the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) and directs Vermonters to stay at home, leaving only for essential reasons critical to health and safety; closes all businesses
and not-for-profit entities; and provides exemptions for certain critical businesses employing Essential Persons; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, the Secretary of the Agency of Human Services and the Secretary of Education, to dismiss schools in Vermont through the end of the year and provide clarity regarding child
care for Essential Persons; and

WHEREAS, this decision is based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at the Vermont Department of Health and is expected to help provide the necessary care and services to prevent and reduce the spread of COVID-19.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby direct the governing bodies
of all public and independent schools as follows:

1.
Schools for preK-12 students shall remain dismissed for in-person instruction for the remainder of the 2019-2020 school year, unless otherwise ordered by the Governor if the COVID-19 response should allow.

2.
Schools are required to have continuity of learning plans for remote learning implemented on or before Monday, April 13, 2020.

3.
The Secretary of the Agency of Education shall issue guidance on or before Friday, May 8, 2020 on end of school year gatherings and graduations.

4.
Schools districts are encouraged to utilize facilities and staff to assist in child care for Essential Persons so long as they adhere to health guidance issued by VDH for operations of child care programs
during the COVID-19 response.

5.
“Essential Persons” are employees of businesses and entities providing services or functions deemed critical to public health and safety, as well as economic and national security as described in Stay
Home/Stay Safe and supplemental guidance issued by the Agency of Commerce and Community Development; provided, however, child care being provided to Essential Persons during the State of Emergency shall only be utilized
by Essential Persons (a) when there is no parent, guardian or other arranged care in the home to care for the child; or (b) in the event of exigent circumstances necessary for the health and safety of the child. Further,
in the event of child care capacity constraints, the children of healthcare providers and other essential healthcare system employees, first responders and essential government employees with primary responsibility
for execution of the COVID-19 response shall receive priority placement.

6.
Pursuant to the powers granted to the Governor in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other provisions of law, I shall from time to time issue recommendations, directives and orders as circumstances may require.

Except as set forth in this Directive, the School Continuity Directive and the Child Care Directive shall remain in full force and effect. This Directive shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until such time as the
Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management and the Agency of Education shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend
or terminate this Directive.

Dated March 26, 2020

GUBERNATORIAL DIRECTIVE TO ALL SCHOOL BOARD AND SUPERINTENDENTS

DIRECTIVE 6 — UNIFORM SCHOOL REOPENING

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency (“Executive Order”), as amended and restated June 15, 2020 (“Amended and Restated Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the
State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on March 1, 2020, the Governor issued Directive 1 to all School Boards and Superintendents for Continuity of Education Planning in order proceed with an orderly dismissal of schools in Vermont to support both the State’s response to COVID-19
and the needs of children and families across Vermont; and

WHEREAS, this decision was based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) and helped to prevent and reduce the spread of COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, at this time, based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at VDH and leading pediatric medical professionals and educators, I have determined to impose a statewide uniform start date for Vermont schools.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby direct the governing bodies
of all public and independent schools as follows:

1.
Except as set forth herein, all public schools and independent schools shall be opened for in person or remote classroom instruction on, but not prior to, Tuesday, September 8, 2020 in accordance with
the health and safety guidance issued by VDH and the Agency of Education.

2.
Schools that primarily serve students with disabilities may start their instructional operations prior to September 8, 2020 based on student needs.

3.
Pursuant to the powers granted to the Governor in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other provisions of law, I shall from time to time issue recommendations, directives and orders as circumstances may require.

4.
The Secretary of Education shall oversee the implementation of this Directive and I hereby delegate to the Secretary of Education such authority as may be necessary for this implementation. All local
school officials and governing bodies shall consult with and abide by the direction of the Secretary of Education with respect to compliance with this Directive. School officials shall work with and assist the Agency
of Education as directed by the Secretary of Education.

This Directive shall take effect upon signing.

Dated July 29, 2020